test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pitta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  
  Noun - pittá: # á-stems pala
    pittá+N+Sg+Nom: pittá
    pittá+N+Sg+Gen: pitá
    pittá+N+Sg+Acc: pitá
    pittá+N+Pl+Ill: pittáid
    pittá+N+Sg+Loc: pittáást
    pittá+N+Sg+Com: pittáin
    pittá+N+Sg+Abe: pitáttáá
    pittá+N+Ess: pittán
    pittá+N+Par: pittád
    pittá+N+Pl+Nom: pitáh
    pittá+N+Pl+Gen: pitái
    pittá+N+Pl+Acc: pittáid
    pittá+N+Sg+Ill: piitán
    pittá+N+Pl+Loc: pittáin
    pittá+N+Pl+Com: pitáiguin
    pittá+N+Pl+Abe: pitáittáá
